Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1002
Cooperation with other states.

After the preparation of the plan as designated in section 13-1001, the governing body or bodies having jurisdiction thereof are hereby given power and authority to confer and cooperate with the proper authorities of the other state or states involved and to modify or adjust said plan if necessary in order to correlate the use, development and improvement of the entire area involved.

Laws 1935, c. 39, § 2, p. 155;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-1702;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-902.